Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 10 Tender and Offer to Confess Judgment

Cross references. —

As to judgment by confession generally, see §§

1-16-201

and

1-16-202

.

As to enforcement of judgments generally, see chapter 17 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Judgments §§ 1098 to 1151; 74 Am. Jur. 2d Tender § 1 et seq.

Keeping tender good so as to sustain purchaser's claim for damages in suit for specific performance, 7 ALR2d 1204.

Payment of obligor on note or other instrument containing warrant of attorney to confess judgment as extending time within which power to confess may be exercised, 35 ALR2d 1452.

Successive judgments by confession on cognovit note or similar instrument, 80 ALR2d 1380.

Agent's authority to execute warrant of attorney to confess judgment against principal, 92 ALR2d 952.

Requirements as to signing, sealing and attestation in warrants of attorney to confess judgment, 3 ALR3d 1147.

Constitutionality, construction, application and effect of statute invalidating powers of attorney to confess judgment or contract giving such powers, 40 ALR3d 1158.

Institution of confessed judgment proceedings as ground of action for abuse of process or malicious prosecution, 87 ALR3d 554.

49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 188 to 192.

§ 1-10-101.
Tender of money before action.

In an action on contract
for the payment of money, if the defendant answers and proves that
he tendered payment of the money due before commencement of the action,
and pays to the clerk before trial the money so tendered, the plaintiff
shall not have judgment for more than the money so tendered and due,
without costs, and shall pay the defendant his costs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 188; R.S. 1887, § 2524; R.S. 1899, § 3615; C.S. 1910, § 4470; C.S. 1920, § 5740; R.S. 1931, § 89-1220; C.S. 1945, § 3-2201; W.S. 1957, § 1-71; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Right to interest. —

Where holder of savings certificates issued by building and loan association was member of association and had received no legal tender of part payments made to other members, but deposit was made in court after holder sued on certificates, latter was entitled to interest from times of payments to others to times of deposit. Radalj v. Union Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 59 Wyo. 140, 138 P.2d 984,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 59 Wyo. 186, 141 P.2d 856 (Wyo. 1943).

§ 1-10-102.
Tender of payment other than money or performance of labor.

If, in an action on a
contract for the payment of anything other than money or for the performance
of labor, the defendant answers that he did tender payment or performance
of the contract at such time and place, and in such things or labor
as by the contract he was bound to pay or perform, and the court or
jury finds that he did tender as alleged in his pleading, they shall
assess the value of the property or labor so tendered, and judgment
shall be rendered in favor of the plaintiff for the value found, without
interest or costs. If the defendant forthwith performs his contract,
or gives to the plaintiff such assurance as the court approves that
he will perform within such time as the court directs, judgment shall
be rendered for the defendant. If any article so tendered is perishable
it shall, from the time of tender, be kept at the risk and expense
of the plaintiff, provided the defendant takes reasonable care of
the same.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 189; R.S. 1887, § 2525; R.S. 1899, § 3616; C.S. 1910, § 4471; C.S. 1920, § 5741; R.S. 1931, § 89-1221; C.S. 1945, § 3-2202; W.S. 1957, § 1-72; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-10-103.
Offer to confess judgment before action brought.

Before an action for
recovery of money is brought against any person, he may go into the
court of competent jurisdiction in the county of his residence or
the county in which the person having the cause of action resides,
and offer to confess judgment in favor of the claimant for a specified
sum. If the claimant, having such notice as the court deems reasonable
that the offer will be made, its amount, and the time and place of
making it fails to attend and accept the confession, or if he attends
and refuses to accept it and afterwards commences an action upon the
cause and fails to recover more than the amount offered to be confessed,
with interest from the date of the offer, he shall pay all the costs
of the action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 190; R.S. 1887, § 2526; R.S. 1899, § 3617; C.S. 1910, § 4472; C.S. 1920, § 5742; R.S. 1931, § 89-1222; C.S. 1945, § 3-2203; W.S. 1957, § 1-73; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 1-10-104.
Offer in court to confess for part of claim or causes.

The defendant in an action
for the recovery of money may offer in court to confess judgment for
part of the amount claimed, or part of the causes involved in the
action. If the plaintiff, being present, refuses to accept such confession
of judgment in full satisfaction of his demands in the action, or
having had such notice as the court deems reasonable that the offer
would be made, its amount, and the time of making it, fails to attend,
and, on the trial, does not recover more than was offered to be confessed,
with interest from the date of the offer, the plaintiff shall pay
all costs of the defendant incurred after the offer was made.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 192; R.S. 1887, § 2528; R.S. 1899, § 3619; C.S. 1910, § 4474; C.S. 1920, § 5744; R.S. 1931, § 89-1224; C.S. 1945, § 3-2205; W.S. 1957, § 1-74; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

Judgment exceeded matters confessed. —

In an action to establish a permanent easement, judgment entered on a partial confession of judgment in favor of dominant estate owners was void; the judgment went beyond the matters admitted in the servient estate owner's confession of judgment. Huish v. Sulenta, 2002 WY 139, 54 P.3d 748,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-10-105.
Offer to confess not to affect trial.

An offer to confess judgment
is not an admission of the cause of action nor of the amount to which
the plaintiff is entitled. It is not a cause of continuance of the
action, or a postponement of the trial, and may not be offered or
admitted in evidence or mentioned at the trial.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 193; R.S. 1887, § 2529; R.S. 1899, § 3620; C.S. 1910, § 4475; C.S. 1920, § 5745; R.S. 1931, § 89-1225; C.S. 1945, § 3-2206; W.S. 1957, § 1-75; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Theory of case not admitted. —

Where plaintiff pleaded that he loaned money to defendant savings and loan association and defendant pleaded that plaintiff was member of defendant association, association's deposit with clerk in partial satisfaction of plaintiff's claim did not admit correctness of plaintiff's theory of case. Radalj v. Union Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 59 Wyo. 140, 138 P.2d 984,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 59 Wyo. 186, 141 P.2d 856 (Wyo. 1943).

§ 1-10-106.
Applicability of confession of judgment provisions.

The provisions relating
to confessions of judgment shall apply so far as practicable to an
offer made by the plaintiff, and in the discretion of the court, may
be applied to one (1) or more of several causes of action, counterclaims,
cross-claims or setoffs, and the court shall make such order as to
costs as it deems proper.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 194; R.S. 1887, § 2530; R.S. 1899, § 3621; C.S. 1910, § 4476; C.S. 1920, § 5746; R.S. 1931, § 89-1226; C.S. 1945, § 3-2207; W.S. 1957, § 1-76; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.